en: Cantal
xx: Cantal
ar: كانتال
fa: کانتال
fr: Cantal, fourme de Cantal, cantalet, Cantals
hy: Կանտալ
ja: カンタル
jv: Kèju cantal
ko: 캉탈
ru: Канталь
uk: Канталь
zh: 康塔爾芝士

en: Raw milk cantal
fr: Cantal au lait cru

en: Pasteurized milk cantal
fr: Cantal au lait pasteurisé

en: Laguiole
fr: Laguiole

en: Chaource, Chaource cheeses, Chaource cheese from cow's milk
fr: Chaource

en: Crottin cheese from goat's milk
fr: Crottin de chèvre

en: Crottin cheese from goat's milk from raw milk
fr: Crottin de chèvre au lait cru

en: Crottin de Chavignol cheese
fr: Crottins de Chavignol, Crottin de Chavignol, Chavignol

en: Époisses de Bourgogne, Epoisses de Bourgogne, Époisses
fr: Époisses, Epoisses
hr: Époisses de bourgogne
nl: Époisse uit de Bourgogne

en: French Gruyères, Gruyere cheese France Protected Geographical Indication from cow's milk
de: Gruyères français, Gruyère français
fr: Gruyères de France, Gruyères français, Gruyère français, Gruyère IGP France, Gruyères IGP
hr: Francuski gruyères
nl: Gruyère uit Frankrijk, Franse Gruyère

en: Langres, Langres cheeses, Langres cheese from cow's milk
xx: langres
fr: Langres

en: Morbier, Morbier cheeses, Morbier cheese from cow's milk
xx: Morbiers
de: Morbier Käse
fr: Morbiers
it: Formaggio Morbier

en: Neufchâtel cheese from cow's milk
fr: Neufchâtel

en: Ossau-Iraty cheeses, Ossau-Iraty cheeses from ewe's milk
fr: Ossau-Iraty, Ossau-lraty

en: Picodon
fr: Picodon

en: Pouligny-Saint-Pierre, Pouligny Saint-Pierre
fr: Pouligny-Saint-Pierre, Pouligny Saint-Pierre

en: Rocamadour
fr: Rocamadour

en: Sainte-Maure de Touraine, Sainte Maure cheese
fr: Sainte-Maure de Touraine

en: Saint-Marcellin, Saint-Marcellin cheeses, Saint-Marcellin cheese from cow's milk
fr: Saint-Marcellin

en: Salers cheese
fr: Salers